Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.265

Dishonored check or negotiable instrument.

Except as otherwise specified by law, in the event a check or negotiable instrument as defined by RCW 62A.3-104 is dishonored by nonacceptance or nonpayment, the department is entitled to collect a reasonable handling fee for each instrument. If the check or instrument is not paid within fifteen days and proper notice is sent, the department is authorized to recover the assessment, the handling fee, and any other charges allowed by RCW 62A.3-515.

[ 1995 c 374 s 65.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.